test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_miina_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - miina: # ok 1B v-g, VVCC > VC, C > C1
    miina+N+Sg+Nom: miina
    miina+N+Sg+Gen: miina
    miina+N+Sg+Acc: miina
    miina+N+Sg+Ill: miinan
    miina+N+Sg+Loc: miinast
    miina+N+Sg+Com: miináin
    miina+N+Sg+Abe: miinattáá
    miina+N+Ess: miinan
    miina+N+Par: miinad
    miina+N+Pl+Nom: miinah
    miina+N+Pl+Gen: miinaij
    miina+N+Pl+Acc: miinaijd
    miina+N+Pl+Ill: miináid
    miina+N+Pl+Loc: miináijn
    miina+N+Pl+Com: miinaijguin
    miina+N+Pl+Abe: miinaijttáá
